Colorado statutes. TITLE 20 District Attorneys
PART 2
DEPUTIES, ASSISTANTS, AND EMPLOYEES

20-1-201. Deputies - chief deputies - staff.

The district attorney in every judicial district is authorized to appoint such deputy district attorneys as he deems necessary to properly discharge the duties of his office, with the approval of the board of county commissioners or boards of county commissioners of multicounty districts or the city council of a city and county affected, and such deputies shall hold their offices during the pleasure of such district attorney. Such deputies shall not engage in the private practice of law nor receive any income from any private law firm.

The district attorney in every judicial district is authorized to appoint one or more part-time deputies to fulfill the duties of the district attorney. The part-time deputies shall be entitled to receive as compensation for services rendered a sum as provided in section 20-1-203. The part-time deputy may engage in the private practice of law; except that he or she may not engage in the practice of criminal defense in the same judicial district as the district attorney's office where he or she is employed.

The district attorney in every judicial district is authorized to appoint such special deputy district attorneys as he deems necessary to properly discharge the duties of his office, and such special deputies shall hold their offices during the pleasure of such district attorney. Such special deputies shall receive no compensation for their services from the county or counties of the judicial district; except that such special deputies may be reimbursed their ordinary and necessary expenses, including travel. Such special deputies shall only be appointed from among those persons holding office as attorney general, deputy attorney general, assistant attorney general, or special assistant attorney general of the state of Colorado, or as district attorney, assistant district attorney, chief deputy district attorney, or deputy district attorney of another judicial district, or as United States attorney or assistant United States attorney for the district of Colorado, or as city attorney or assistant city attorney of a city and county in this state, or an attorney employed by the Colorado district attorneys' council and actively licensed to practice law in the state of Colorado.

To prosecute felony nonsupport actions pursuant to article 6 of title 14, the district attorney in every judicial district is authorized to appoint any attorney performing child support enforcement services for the county department of human or social services pursuant to article 13 of title 26 as a special deputy district attorney, whether the attorney is employed by the department directly, as a contractual agent for the department, or through the services of a private company under contract with the department. A special deputy district attorney appointed pursuant to this subsection (1) shall not be granted all of the powers enumerated in section 16-2.5-101. The powers granted by this appointment are limited to the prosecutions delineated in this subsection (1).

The district attorney in every judicial district may designate and appoint chief deputy district attorneys, who shall be attorneys-at-law admitted to practice within this state. All chief deputy district attorneys shall hold office at the pleasure of the district attorney; except that no district attorney may appoint more than one chief deputy district attorney without the prior approval of the board of county commissioners or boards of county commissioners of multicounty districts or the city council of the city and county affected. Such chief deputies shall not engage in the private practice of law nor receive any income from any private law firm.

Repealed.

The district attorney shall provide that any member of his staff be assigned regular duties or duty hours in accordance with the schedule of compensation paid such staff member.

Source:

L. 1885:

p. 176, § 1.

L. 1889:

p. 150, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2102.

C.L.

§ 5983.

CSA:

C. 55, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 45-3-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-3-1.

L. 67:

p. 596, § 2.

L. 71:

p. 516, § 2.

L. 73:

p. 550, § 1.

L. 75:

(1) and (2) amended, pp. 656, 657, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(1)(c) added, p. 769, § 1, effective May 18.

L. 80:

(1)(c) amended, p. 549, § 1, effective March 17.

L. 96:

(1)(d) added and (3) amended, p. 613, §§ 17, 18, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(d) amended, p. 1199, § 54, effective August 4.

L. 2013:

(1)(b) and (1)(c) amended, (SB 13-229), ch. 272, p. 1431, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(1)(d) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 434, § 83, effective August 8; (3) repealed, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 693, § 7, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

The amendments made to this section in 1975 were in an act with a July 1, 1975, effective date, but the Governor did not sign the act until July 14, 1975.

Cross references:

(1) For oath and bond of deputies and chief deputies, see § 20-1-101.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018. For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1138, see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

20-1-202. Powers of deputies.

The deputy has all the powers of the district attorney.

Source:

L. 1885:

p. 176, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 2103.

C.L.

§ 5984.

CSA:

C. 55, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 45-3-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-3-2.

20-1-203. Compensation of deputy, chief deputy, and assistant district attorneys.

Compensation for all deputy, chief deputy, part-time deputy, assistant, and part-time assistant district attorneys shall be fixed by the district attorney with the approval of the board of county commissioners or boards of county commissioners of multicounty districts or the city council of a city and county affected, and each county comprising such judicial district shall pay such deputies, chief deputies, assistants, and part-time assistants salaries in the proportion which the population of such county bears to the whole population of such judicial district.

Source:

L. 1891:

p, 308, § 3.

L. 1899:

p. 333, § 3.

L. 03:

p. 207, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2584.

L. 15:

p. 244, § 1.

C.L.

§ 7949.

L. 33:

p. 435, § 1.

CSA:

C. 66, § 98.

L. 41:

p. 409, § 2.

L. 49:

p. 406, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 45-3-3.

L. 55:

p. 290, § 3.

L. 59:

p. 378, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-3-3.

L. 67:

pp. 597, 599, §§ 3, 6.

L. 71:

p. 517, § 3.

L. 73:

p. 550, § 2.

L. 75:

Entire section R&RE, p. 657, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-229), ch. 272, p. 1432, § 15, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The amendments made to this section in 1975 were in an act with a July 1, 1975, effective date, but the Governor did not sign the act until July 14, 1975.

20-1-204. Powers of chief deputy.

The chief deputy district attorney has all the powers of the district attorney.

Source:

L. 09:

p. 343, § 2.

C.L.

§ 5986.

CSA:

C. 55, § 14.

L. 41:

p. 387, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 45-3-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-3-7.

20-1-205. Assistant district attorneys.

In every judicial district, the district attorney is authorized to appoint an assistant district attorney who shall be an attorney-at-law admitted to practice within this state and who shall actually have practiced law not less than two years.

Repealed.

The district attorney in every judicial district having a population not exceeding fifty thousand may appoint one part-time assistant district attorney. Such part-time assistant may engage in the private practice of law.

Repealed.

The salaries authorized by subsection (1) of this section shall be paid monthly and shall be paid by the counties comprising such judicial district out of the ordinary revenues of such counties. Every county shall pay in proportion as the population of such county bears to the whole population of such judicial district, according to the latest federal census.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 433, § 1.

CSA:

C. 55, § 10.

L. 41:

p. 384, § 1.

L. 51:

p. 349, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 45-3-5.

L. 55:

p. 290, § 4.

L. 59:

p. 379, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-3-8.

L. 67:

pp. 598, 599, §§ 4, 6.

L. 71:

p. 517, § 4.

L. 73:

p. 551, § 3.

L. 75:

(1)(a) and (1)(c) amended and (1)(b) repealed, p. 657, §§ 4, 5, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(2) repealed, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 694, § 8, effective August 8.

20-1-206. Powers.

All matters and things required or which may be done by the district attorney may be done with like force and effect by his assistant under the direction and control of the district attorney, and he has all the powers of the district attorney by whom he was appointed; except that such acts shall all be done in the name of the district attorney.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 294, § 2.

C.L.

§ 5988.

CSA:

C. 55, § 16.

CRS 53:

§ 45-3-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-3-10.

20-1-207. Powers of assistant.

The assistant district attorney has all the powers of the district attorney.

Source:

L. 1893:

p. 236, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 2101.

C.L.

§ 5982.

CSA:

C. 55, § 9.

L. 41:

p. 387, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 45-3-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-3-11.

20-1-208. Special officers - stenographers - salaries.

The district attorney of each judicial district in this state having more than one hundred thousand population, as shown by the last decennial census, except the city and county of Denver, is authorized by and with the consent of the district judges of the judicial district to appoint one or two special officers, each at an annual salary to be determined by such district judges of not to exceed five thousand dollars, and actual and necessary expenses; and in his district he is authorized by and with the consent of the district judges of the judicial district to appoint a stenographer at an annual salary to be determined by such district judges of not to exceed three thousand dollars. Said salaries shall be paid monthly and shall be borne and paid monthly by the several counties comprising said judicial districts. Each county shall pay its proportionate part of said salaries as the population of such county bears to the whole population of the judicial district, according to the last preceding decennial census.

The district attorney of each judicial district in the state having a population of less than one hundred thousand as shown by the last decennial census is authorized to appoint a special investigator, a stenographer, and such other technical and professional assistants as are necessary to assist him in properly transacting all of the business of his office. The salary and compensation for such employees and assistants shall be fixed by such district attorney in an amount commensurate with the services performed and the duties and responsibilities of such employees. The salaries of such persons so appointed shall be paid by the various counties within the judicial district, each county paying its proportionate part of said salaries as the population of such county bears to the whole population of such judicial district, according to the last preceding decennial census. Such budget shall be approved by the boards of county commissioners.

Source:

L. 07:

p. 370, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 2105.

C.L.

§ 5990.

CSA:

C. 55, § 18.

L. 47:

p. 394, § 1.

L. 51:

p. 353, § 1.

L. 52:

p. 104, § 1.

L. 53:

p. 254, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 45-3-14.

L. 57:

p. 339, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-3-12.

20-1-209. Investigators and other employees.

The district attorney of each judicial district is authorized to appoint a chief investigator and such other investigators as he may deem necessary in the conduct of his office and such stenographers, office employees, and other technical and professional assistants as are necessary to properly transact the business of his office. The salary and compensation in each instance for such employees and assistants shall be fixed by such district attorney in an amount commensurate with the services performed and the duties and responsibilities of such employees, subject to the approval of the board of county commissioners of the county or the city council of a city and county affected.

The salaries of any personnel so appointed shall be paid by the various counties within the judicial district, each county paying its proportionate part of said salaries as the population of such county bears to the whole population of such judicial district, according to the last preceding federal census.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 314, § 2.

CSA:

C. 55, § 15 (1).

CRS 53:

§ 45-3-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-3-13.

L. 67:

p. 598, § 5.

20-1-210. Prohibition of practice of law - associates - members of district attorney's staff.

No attorney-at-law practicing law in the state of Colorado who is a member of a private law firm with which a district attorney, assistant district attorney, or deputy district attorney is associated may defend any person or persons who are being prosecuted by a salaried staff member of the office of said district attorney; nor may any such salaried staff member defend any person or persons who are being prosecuted in any judicial district in the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 382, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 45-3-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-3-14.

L. 71:

p. 518, § 5.